pt-PT: Compatibilidade de tamanho do punho do taco: Tamanho real / sénior; Júnior (tamanho 0-6); Pega longa (LH); Pega curta (SH); Jovem (Harrow); Outro
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของขนาดด้ามจับไม้คริกเก็ต: ขนาดเต็ม/ผู้ใหญ่; เด็ก (ขนาด 0-6); ด้ามยาว (LH); ด้ามสั้น (SH); เยาวชน (Harrow); อื่นๆ
el: Συμβατότητα του μεγέθους της λαβής του ρόπαλου: Πλήρους μεγέθους / senior; Junior (μέγεθος 0-6); Μακριά λαβή (LH); Κοντή λαβή (SH); Νέων (Harrow); Άλλο
lt-LT: Lazdos rankenos dydžio suderinamumas: Pilnas dydis / suaugusiųjų; Jaunių (0–6 dydis); Ilga rankena (LH); Trumpa rankena (SH); Jaunimo („Harrow“); Kita
bg-BG: Съвместимост на размера на дръжката на бухалката: Пълен размер/за възрастни; За юноши (размер 0 – 6); Дълга дръжка (LH); Къса дръжка (SH); Младежки (Harrow); Друго
de: Griffgröße des Schlägers: Standardgröße / Senior; Junior (Größe 0-6); Langer Griff (LH); Kurzer Griff (SH); Jugend (Harrow); Sonstige
vi: Khả năng tương thích kích thước cán vợt: Cỡ tiêu chuẩn / người lớn; Trẻ em (cỡ 0-6); Cán dài (LH); Cán ngắn (SH); Thanh thiếu niên (Harrow); Khác
zh-TW: 球棒握把尺寸相容性: 全尺寸/成人; 兒童 (尺寸 0-6); 長柄 (LH); 短柄 (SH); 青少年 (Harrow); 其他
zh-CN: 球拍手柄尺寸兼容性: 全尺寸 / 成人; 青少年（0-6 号）; 长柄 (LH); 短柄 (SH); 青年 (Harrow); 其他
it: Compatibilità handle impugnature di mazze: Misura intera / senior; Junior (taglia 0-6); Manico lungo (LH); Manico corto (SH); Ragazzi (Harrow); Altro
fi: Mailan kahvan koon yhteensopivuus: Täysikokoinen / aikuinen; Juniori (koko 0–6); Pitkä kahva (LH); Lyhyt kahva (SH); Nuori (Harrow); Muu
es: Compatibilidad de tamaño del mango del bate: Tamaño completo / sénior; Júnior (tamaño 0-6); Mango largo (LH); Mango corto (SH); Juvenil (Harrow); Otro
pt-BR: Compatibilidade do tamanho do cabo do taco: Tamanho normal / sênior; Júnior (tamanho 0 a 6); Cabo longo (LH); Cabo curto (SH); Juvenil (Harrow); Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilita veľkostí rukoväte pálky: Plná veľkosť/senior; Junior (veľkosti 0–6); Dlhá rukoväť (LH); Krátka rukoväť (SH); Mládež (Harrow); Iné
sv: Slagträets storlekskompatibilitet: Fullstor/senior; Junior (storlek 0 – 6); Långt handtag (LH); Kort handtag (SH); Ungdom (Harrow); Övrigt
ja: バットハンドルサイズ互換性: フルサイズ / シニア; ジュニア (サイズ 0-6); ロングハンドル (LH); ショートハンドル (SH); ユース (Harrow); その他
tr: Sopa sapı boyutu uyumluluğu: Tam boy / yetişkin; Çocuk (0-6 boy); Uzun sap (LH); Kısa sap (SH); Genç (Harrow); Diğer
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost veličine ručke palice: Puna veličina / za seniore; Za juniore (veličina 0 – 6); Duga drška (LH); Kratka drška (SH); Za mlade (Harrow); Ostalo
nl: Cricketbat handvatmaat compatibiliteit: Full size / senior; Junior (maat 0-6); Lange greep (LH); Korte greep (SH); Jeugd (Harrow); Overig
cs: Kompatibilita velikosti rukojeti pálky: Plná velikost / senior; Junior (velikost 0–6); Dlouhá rukojeť (LH); Krátká rukojeť (SH); Mládež (Harrow); Jiné
pl: Kompatybilność rozmiaru uchwytu kija: Pełnowymiarowe / dla dorosłych; Junior (rozmiar 0–6); Długi uchwyt (LH); Krótki uchwyt (SH); Młodzieżowe (Harrow); Inne
ko: 배트 핸들 크기 호환성: 풀 사이즈/시니어; 주니어(사이즈 0~6); 롱 핸들(LH); 숏 핸들(SH); 유스(해로우); 기타
en: Bat handle size compatibility: Full size / senior; Junior (size 0-6); Long handle (LH); Short handle (SH); Youth (Harrow); Other
hu: Ütőazonosító méretének kompatibilitása: Teljes méret / senior; Junior (0–6-os méret); Hosszú nyél (LH); Rövid nyél (SH); Ifjúsági (Harrow); Egyéb
fr: Compatibilité de la taille du manche de la batte: Taille normale / senior; Junior (taille 0 à 6); Manche long (LH); Manche court (SH); Jeune (Harrow); Autre
ru: Совместимость с размерами рукояток биты: Полноразмерная / для взрослых; Подростковая (размер 0–6); Длинная рукоятка (LH); Короткая рукоятка (SH); Юношеская (Harrow); Другое
nb: Balltrereferanse størrelse kompatibilitet: Full størrelse / senior; Junior (størrelse 0–6); Langt håndtak (LH); Kort håndtak (SH); Ungdom (Harrow); Annet
da: Grebsstørrelse battet er kompatibelt med: Fuld størrelse / senior; Junior (størrelse 0-6); Langt håndtag (LH); Kort håndtag (SH); Ungdom (Harrow); Andet
sl-SI: Združljivost velikosti ročaja kija: Polna velikost / senior; Junior (velikost 0–6); Dolg ročaj (LH); Kratek ročaj (SH); Mladinski (Harrow); Drugo
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu dimensiunea mânerului bâtei: Mărime întreagă / senior; Junior (mărimile 0-6); Mâner lung (LH); Mâner scurt (SH); Tineret (Harrow); Altele